Utah statutes.
70A-7a-305.   Destination bills.

(1)  Instead of issuing a bill of lading to the consignor at the place of shipment, a carrier, at the request of the consignor, may procure the bill to be issued at destination or at any other place designated in the request.

(2)  Upon request of any person entitled as against a carrier to control the goods while in transit and on surrender of possession or control of any outstanding bill of lading or other receipt covering the goods, the issuer, subject to Section 70A-7a-105, may procure a substitute bill to be issued at any place designated in the request.



Enacted by Chapter 42, 2006 General Session

